Hawaii statutes.
§321-52 Powers, duties, and activities of
the department. To carry out the purposes of this part, the department of
health may:

(1) Establish and administer a program of services
for children with special health needs, which shall provide for developing,
extending, and improv­ing services, especially in rural areas, for locating
such children, and for providing for medical, surgical, corrective, and other
services and care, and facilities for diagnosis, hospitalization, and
after-care; extend and improve any such services; cooperate with medical,
health, nursing, and welfare groups and organizations and with any agency of
the State charged with the administration of laws providing for vocational
rehabili­tation of children with special health needs; and, cooperate with the
department of education for the education of such children;

(2) Formulate and administer a detailed plan for the
purposes specified in paragraph (1) above; and adopt such rules pursuant to
chapter 91 as may be necessary or desirable for the administration of the plan
and of this part. Any plan shall include provisions for:

(A) Financial participation by the State in
the funds appropriated by the Congress of the United States under applicable
federal legislation;

(B) Administration of the plan by the
department;

(C) Such methods of administration (other
than those relating to selec­tion, tenure of office, and compensation of
personnel) as are neces­sary for the efficient operation of the plan;

(D) Maintenance of records and preparation of
reports of services ren­dered as shall be directed by the Secretary of Health
and Human Services of the United States;

(E) Carrying out the purposes specified in
paragraph (1) above; and

(F) Cooperation with medical, health,
nursing, and welfare groups and organizations and with any agency in the State
charged with admin­istering state laws providing for vocational rehabilitation
of children with special needs;

(3) Cooperate with the federal government through its
appropriate agency or instrumentality in developing, extending, and improving
such services and receive and expend all funds made available to the department
by the federal government, the State, or its political subdivisions, or from
any other sources, including private donations, for such purposes; and

(4) Take all other actions necessary or desirable to
carry out the purposes of this part. [L 1939, c 179, §3; RL 1945, §2103; RL
1955, §46-42; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §§18, 19; HRS §321-52; am L 1981, c 71, §1;
am L 1984, c 13, §1; am L 1988, c 4, §3]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next